Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1128.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-5 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local
Taxes" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-5-2.4. Woonsocket -- Maximum levy.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the city of Woonsocket may levy a
tax for the 2026 fiscal year at a rate of five and one-half percent (5.5%) in excess of the amount
levied and certified by the city for the prior year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003019/SUB A
========